Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.120

Written reports—Limitation on work.

(1) A licensed home inspector shall provide a written report of the home inspection to each person for whom the inspector performs a home inspection within a time period set by the board in rule. The issues to be addressed in the report shall be set by the board in rule.

(2) A licensed home inspector, or other licensed home inspectors or employees who work for the same company or for any company in which the home inspector has a financial interest, shall not, from the time of the inspection until one year from the date of the report, perform any work other than home inspection-related consultation on the home upon which he or she has performed a home inspection.

[ 2008 c 119 s 12.]